Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 3. Perfection and Priority.

Sec. 45.29.301.
Law governing perfection and priority of security interests.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.303

—

45.29.306

, the following rules determine the law governing perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in collateral:

except as otherwise provided in this section, while a debtor is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in collateral;

while collateral is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a possessory security interest in that collateral;

except as otherwise provided in (4) of this section, while tangible negotiable documents, goods, instruments, money, or tangible chattel paper is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs

perfection of a security interest in the goods by filing a fixture filing;

perfection of a security interest in timber to be cut; and

the effect of perfection or nonperfection and the priority of a nonpossessory security interest in the collateral;

the local law of the jurisdiction in which the wellhead or minehead is located governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in as-extracted collateral.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 101 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (3), added “tangible” preceding “negotiable documents, goods, instruments, money”.

Sec. 45.29.302.
Law governing perfection and priority of agricultural liens.

While farm products are located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of an agricultural lien on the farm products.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.303.
Law governing perfection and priority of security interests in goods covered by a certificate of title.

This section applies to goods covered by a certificate of title even if there is no other relationship between the jurisdiction under whose certificate of title the goods are covered and the goods or the debtor.

Goods become covered by a certificate of title when a valid application for the certificate of title and the applicable fee are delivered to the appropriate authority. Goods cease to be covered by a certificate of title at the earlier of the time

the certificate of title ceases to be effective under the law of the issuing jurisdiction; or

the goods become covered subsequently by a certificate of title issued by another jurisdiction.

The local law of the jurisdiction under whose certificate of title the goods are covered governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in goods covered by a certificate of title from the time the goods become covered by the certificate of title until the goods cease to be covered by the certificate of title.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.304.
Law governing perfection and priority of security interests in deposit accounts.

The local law of a bank’s jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a deposit account maintained with that bank.

The following rules determine a bank’s jurisdiction for purposes of AS

45.29.301

—

45.29.342

:

if an agreement between the bank and the debtor governing the deposit account expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is the bank’s jurisdiction for purposes of AS

45.29.301

—

45.29.342

, this chapter, or the code, that jurisdiction is the bank’s jurisdiction;

if (1) of this subsection does not apply and an agreement between the bank and its customer governing the deposit account expressly provides that the agreement is governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the bank’s jurisdiction;

if neither (1) nor (2) of this subsection applies and an agreement between the bank and its customer governing the deposit account expressly provides that the deposit account is maintained at an office in a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the bank’s jurisdiction;

if (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection does not apply, the bank’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the office identified in an account statement as the office serving the customer’s account is located;

if (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this subsection does not apply, the bank’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the chief executive office of the bank is located.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.305.
Law governing perfection and priority of security interests in investment property.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this section, the following rules apply:

while a security certificate is located in a jurisdiction, the local law of that jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in the certificated security represented by the security certificate;

the local law of the issuer’s jurisdiction as specified in AS

45.08.110

governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in an uncertificated security;

the local law of the securities intermediary’s jurisdiction as specified in AS

45.08.110(e)

governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a security entitlement or securities account;

the local law of the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a commodity contract or commodity account.

The following rules determine a commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction for purposes of AS

45.29.301

—

45.29.342

:

if an agreement between the commodity intermediary and commodity customer governing the commodity account expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction for purposes of AS

45.29.301

—

45.29.342

, this chapter, or the code, that jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction;

if (1) of this subsection does not apply and an agreement between the commodity intermediary and commodity customer governing the commodity account expressly provides that the agreement is governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction;

if neither (1) nor (2) of this subsection applies and an agreement between the commodity intermediary and commodity customer governing the commodity account expressly provides that the commodity account is maintained at an office in a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction;

if (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection does not apply, the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the office identified in an account statement as the office serving the commodity customer’s account is located;

if (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this subsection does not apply, the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the chief executive office of the commodity intermediary is located.

The local law of the jurisdiction in which the debtor is located governs

perfection of a security interest in investment property by filing;

automatic perfection of a security interest in investment property created by a broker or securities intermediary; and

automatic perfection of a security interest in a commodity contract or commodity account created by a commodity intermediary.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.306.
Law governing perfection and priority of security interests in letter-of-credit rights.

Subject to (c) of this section, the local law of the issuer’s jurisdiction or a nominated person’s jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a letter-of-credit right if the issuer’s jurisdiction or nominated person’s jurisdiction is a state.

For purposes of AS

45.29.301

—

45.29.342

, an issuer’s jurisdiction or nominated person’s jurisdiction is the jurisdiction whose law governs the liability of the issuer or nominated person with respect to the letter-of-credit right as provided in AS

45.05.116

.

This section does not apply to a security interest that is perfected only under AS

45.29.308(d)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.307.
Location of debtor.

In this section, “place of business” means a place where a debtor conducts its affairs.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the following rules determine a debtor’s location:

a debtor who is an individual is located at the individual’s principal residence;

a debtor that is an organization and has only one place of business is located at its place of business;

a debtor that is an organization and has more than one place of business is located at its chief executive office.

The provisions of (b) of this section apply only if a debtor’s residence, place of business, or chief executive office, as applicable, is located in a jurisdiction whose law generally requires information concerning the existence of a nonpossessory security interest to be made generally available in a filing, recording, or registration system as a condition or result of the security interest’s obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the collateral. If (b) of this section does not apply, the debtor is located in the District of Columbia.

A person who ceases to exist, have a residence, or have a place of business continues to be located in the jurisdiction specified by (b) and (c) of this section.

A registered organization that is organized under the law of a state is located in that state.

Except as otherwise provided in (i) of this section, a registered organization that is organized under the law of the United States and a branch or agency of a bank that is not organized under the law of the United States or a state are located

in the state that the law of the United States designates if the law designates a state of location;

in the state that the registered organization, branch, or agency designates if the law of the United States authorizes the registered organization, branch, or agency to designate its state of location, including by designating its main office, home office, or other comparable office; or

in the District of Columbia if neither (1) nor (2) of this subsection applies.

A registered organization continues to be located in the jurisdiction specified by (e) or (f) of this section notwithstanding

the suspension, revocation, forfeiture, or lapse of the registered organization’s status as such in its jurisdiction of organization; or

the dissolution, winding up, or cancellation of the existence of the registered organization.

The United States is located in the District of Columbia.

A branch or agency of a bank that is not organized under the law of the United States or a state is located in the state in which the branch or agency is licensed if all branches and agencies of the bank are licensed in only one state.

A foreign air carrier, under the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended, is located at the designated office of the agent upon which service of process may be made on behalf of the carrier.

This section applies only for purposes of AS

45.29.301

—

45.29.342

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 9 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, at the end of (f)(2), added “, including by designating its main office, home office, or other comparable office”.

Editor’s notes. —

Federal Aviation Act of 1958, referred to in subsection (j), may be found at 49 USC 41301 et seq.

Sec. 45.29.308.
When security interest or agricultural lien is perfected; continuity of perfection.

Except as otherwise provided in this section and AS

45.29.309

, a security interest is perfected if it has attached and all of the applicable requirements for perfection in AS

45.29.310

—

45.29.316

have been satisfied. A security interest is perfected when it attaches if the applicable requirements are satisfied before the security interest attaches.

An agricultural lien is perfected if it has become effective and all of the applicable requirements for perfection in AS

45.29.310

have been satisfied. An agricultural lien is perfected when it becomes effective if the applicable requirements are satisfied before the agricultural lien becomes effective.

A security interest or agricultural lien is perfected continuously if it is originally perfected by one method under this chapter and is later perfected by another method under this chapter, without an intermediate period when it was unperfected.

Perfection of a security interest in collateral also perfects a security interest in a supporting obligation for the collateral.

Perfection of a security interest in a right to payment or performance also perfects a security interest in a security interest, mortgage, or other lien on personal or real property securing the right.

Perfection of a security interest in a securities account also perfects a security interest in the security entitlements carried in the securities account.

Perfection of a security interest in a commodity account also perfects a security interest in the commodity contracts carried in the commodity account.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Collateral references. —

Construction and effect of UCC Art. 9, dealing with secured transactions, sales of accounts, contract rights, and chattel paper, 30 ALR3d 9; 67 ALR3d 308; 69 ALR3d 1162; 76 ALR3d 11; 99 ALR3d 807; 99 ALR3d 1080; 100 ALR3d 10; 100 ALR3d 940; 7 ALR4th 308; 11 ALR4th 241; 90 ALR4th 859; 25 ALR5th 696.

Sec. 45.29.309.
Security interest perfected upon attachment.

The following security interests are perfected when they attach:

a purchase money security interest in consumer goods, except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.311(b)

with respect to consumer goods that are subject to a statute or treaty described in AS

45.29.311(a)

;

an assignment of accounts or payment intangibles that does not, by itself or in conjunction with other assignments to the same assignee, transfer a significant part of the assignor’s outstanding accounts or payment intangibles;

a sale of a payment intangible;

a sale of a promissory note;

a security interest created by the assignment of a health care insurance receivable to the provider of the health care goods or services;

a security interest arising under AS

45.02.401

,

45.02.505

,

45.02.711(c)

, or AS

45.12.508(e)

, until the debtor obtains possession of the collateral;

a security interest of a collecting bank arising under AS

45.04.210

;

a security interest of an issuer or nominated person arising under AS

45.05.118

;

a security interest arising in the delivery of a financial asset under AS

45.29.206(c)

;

a security interest in investment property created by a broker or securities intermediary;

a security interest in a commodity contract or a commodity account created by a commodity intermediary;

an assignment for the benefit of all creditors of the transferor and subsequent transfers by the assignee thereunder; and

a security interest created by an assignment of a beneficial interest in a decedent’s estate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.310.
When filing required to perfect security interest or agricultural lien; security interests and agricultural liens to which filing provisions do not apply.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section and AS

45.29.312(b)

, a financing statement must be filed to perfect all security interests and agricultural liens.

The filing of a financing statement is not necessary to perfect a security interest

that is perfected under AS

45.29.308(d)

, (e), (f), or (g);

that is perfected under AS

45.29.309

when it attaches;

in property subject to a statute, regulation, or treaty described in AS

45.29.311(a)

;

in goods in possession of a bailee that is perfected under AS

45.29.312(d)(1)

or (2);

in certificated securities, documents, goods, or instruments that is perfected without filing, control, or possession under AS

45.29.312(e)

, (f), or (g);

in collateral in the secured party’s possession under AS

45.29.313

;

in a certificated security that is perfected by delivery of the security certificate to the secured party under AS

45.29.313

;

in deposit accounts, electronic chattel paper, electronic documents, investment property, or letter-of-credit rights that is perfected by control under AS

45.29.314

;

in proceeds that is perfected under AS

45.29.315

; or

that is perfected under AS

45.29.316

.

If a secured party assigns a perfected security interest or agricultural lien, a filing under this chapter is not required to continue the perfected status of the security interest against creditors of and transferees from the original debtor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 102 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (b)(5), added “, control,” preceding “or possession under”; in (b)(8), added “electronic documents,” preceding “investment property”.

Sec. 45.29.311.
Perfection of security interests in property subject to certain statutes, regulations, and treaties.

Except as otherwise provided in (d) of this section, the filing of a financing statement is not necessary or effective to perfect a security interest in property subject to

a statute, regulation, or treaty of the United States whose requirements for a security interest’s obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the property preempt AS

45.29.310(a)

;

AS 28.10; however, during a period in which collateral is inventory held for sale by a person who is in the business of selling goods of that kind, the filing provisions of AS

45.29.501

—

45.29.525

apply to a security interest in that collateral created by that person as debtor; or

a statute of another jurisdiction that provides for a security interest to be indicated on a certificate of title as a condition or result of the security interest’s obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor with respect to the property.

Compliance with the requirements of a statute, regulation, or treaty described in (a) of this section for obtaining priority over the rights of a lien creditor is equivalent to the filing of a financing statement under this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in (d) of this section, AS

45.29.313

, and

45.29.316(d)

and (e) for goods covered by a certificate of title, a security interest in property subject to a statute, regulation, or treaty described in (a) of this section may be perfected only by compliance with those requirements, and a security interest so perfected remains perfected notwithstanding a change in the use or transfer of possession of the collateral.

Except as otherwise provided in (d) of this section and AS

45.29.316(d)

and (e), duration and renewal of perfection of a security interest perfected by compliance with the requirements prescribed by a statute, regulation, or treaty described in (a) of this section are governed by the statute, regulation, or treaty. In other respects, the security interest is subject to this chapter.

During a period in which collateral subject to a statute specified in (a)(2) of this section is inventory held for sale or lease by a person or leased by that person as lessor and that person is in the business of selling goods of that kind, this section does not apply to a security interest in that collateral created by that person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 10 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, in (a)(2) of this section, “AS

45.29.501

—

45.29.525

” was substituted for “AS

45.29.501

— 45.29.527” to correct a manifest error in ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the first part of (a)(3), which read “a certificate-of-title statute of another jurisdiction that provides for a security interest to be indicated on the certificate”.

Sec. 45.29.312.
Perfection of security interests in chattel paper, deposit accounts, documents, goods covered by documents, instruments, investment property, letter-of-credit rights, and money; perfection by permissive filing; temporary perfection without filing or transfer of possession.

A security interest in chattel paper, negotiable documents, instruments, or investment property may be perfected by filing.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.315(c)

and (d) for proceeds,

a security interest in a deposit account may be perfected only by control under AS

45.29.314

;

and except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.308(d)

, a security interest in a letter-of-credit right may be perfected only by control under AS

45.29.314

; and

a security interest in money may be perfected only by the secured party’s taking possession under AS

45.29.313

.

While goods are in the possession of a bailee that has issued a negotiable document covering the goods, a security interest

in the goods may be perfected by perfecting a security interest in the document; and

perfected in the document has priority over a security interest that becomes perfected in the goods by another method during that time.

While goods are in the possession of a bailee that has issued a nonnegotiable document covering the goods, a security interest in the goods may be perfected by

issuance of a document in the name of the secured party;

the bailee’s receipt of notification of the secured party’s interest; or

filing as to the goods.

A security interest in certificated securities, negotiable documents, or instruments is perfected without filing or the taking of possession or control for a period of 20 days from the time the security interest attaches to the extent that it arises for new value given under an authenticated security agreement.

A perfected security interest in a negotiable document or goods in possession of a bailee, other than one that has issued a negotiable document for the goods, remains perfected for 20 days without filing if the secured party makes available to the debtor the goods or documents representing the goods for the purpose of

ultimate sale or exchange; or

loading, unloading, storing, shipping, transshipping, manufacturing, processing, or otherwise dealing with the goods or documents representing the goods in a manner preliminary to their sale or exchange.

A perfected security interest in a certificated security or instrument remains perfected for 20 days without filing if the secured party delivers the security certificate or instrument to the debtor for the purpose of

ultimate sale or exchange; or

presentation, collection, enforcement, renewal, or registration of transfer.

After the 20-day period specified in (e), (f), or (g) of this section expires, perfection depends upon compliance with this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 103 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (e), added “or control” following “taking of possession”.

Sec. 45.29.313.
When possession by or delivery to secured party perfects security interest without filing.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section, a secured party may perfect a security interest in tangible negotiable documents, goods, instruments, money, or tangible chattel paper by taking possession of the collateral. A secured party may perfect a security interest in certificated securities by taking delivery of the certificated securities under AS

45.08.301

.

With respect to goods covered by a certificate of title issued by this state, a secured party may perfect a security interest in the goods by taking possession of the goods only in the circumstances described in AS

45.29.316(d)

.

With respect to collateral other than certificated securities and goods covered by a document, a secured party takes possession of collateral in the possession of a person other than the debtor, the secured party, or a lessee of the collateral from the debtor in the ordinary course of the debtor’s business, when the person

in possession authenticates a record acknowledging that the person holds possession of the collateral for the secured party’s benefit; or

takes possession of the collateral after having authenticated a record acknowledging that it will hold possession of collateral for the secured party’s benefit.

If perfection of a security interest depends upon possession of the collateral by a secured party, perfection occurs no earlier than the time the secured party takes possession and continues only while the secured party retains possession.

A security interest in a certificated security in registered form is perfected by delivery when delivery of the certificated security occurs under AS

45.08.301

and remains perfected by delivery until the debtor obtains possession of the security certificate.

A person in possession of collateral is not required to acknowledge that it holds possession for a secured party’s benefit.

If a person acknowledges that it holds possession for the secured party’s benefit,

the acknowledgment is effective under (c) of this section or AS

45.08.301(a)

, even if the acknowledgment violates the rights of a debtor; and

unless the person otherwise agrees or law other than this chapter otherwise provides, the person does not owe a duty to the secured party and is not required to confirm the acknowledgment to another person.

A secured party having possession of collateral does not relinquish possession by delivering the collateral to a person other than the debtor or a lessee of the collateral from the debtor in the ordinary course of the debtor’s business if the person was instructed before the delivery or is instructed contemporaneously with the delivery to

hold possession of the collateral for the secured party’s benefit; or

redeliver the collateral to the secured party.

A secured party does not relinquish possession, even if a delivery under (h) of this section violates the rights of a debtor. A person to whom collateral is delivered under (h) of this section does not owe a duty to the secured party and is not required to confirm the delivery to another person unless the person otherwise agrees or law other than this chapter otherwise provides.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 59 ch 41 SLA 2009; am § 104 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of (a) of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (b), substituted “AS

45.29.316(d)

” for “AS

45.29.316(e)

”.

The second 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (a), added “tangible” preceding “negotiable documents, goods, instruments, money”.

Sec. 45.29.314.
Perfection by control.

A security interest in deposit accounts, electronic chattel paper, investment property, letter-of-credit rights, or electronic documents may be perfected by control of the collateral under AS

45.07.116

, AS

45.29.104

,

45.29.105

,

45.29.106

, or

45.29.107

.

A security interest in deposit accounts, electronic chattel paper, letter-of-credit rights, or electronic documents is perfected by control under AS

45.07.116

, AS

45.29.104

,

45.29.105

, or

45.29.107

when the secured party obtains control and remains perfected by control only while the secured party retains control.

A security interest in investment property is perfected by control under AS

45.29.106

from the time the secured party obtains control and remains perfected by control until

the secured party does not have control; and

one of the following occurs:

if the collateral is a certificated security, the debtor has or acquires possession of the security certificate;

if the collateral is an uncertificated security, the issuer has registered or registers the debtor as the registered owner; or

if the collateral is a security entitlement, the debtor is or becomes the entitlement holder.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 60 ch 41 SLA 2009; am §§ 105, 106 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (a), deleted “, or” following “letter-of-credit rights,”.

The second 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, in (a), deleted “or” following “investment property,” and added “AS

45.07.116

,” following “control of the collateral under”; in (b), added “, or electronic documents” following “letter-of-credit rights”, and “AS

45.07.116

” following “perfected by control under”; made a related stylistic change.

Sec. 45.29.315.
Secured party’s rights on disposition of collateral and in proceeds.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter,

a security interest or agricultural lien continues in collateral notwithstanding sale, lease, license, exchange, or other disposition of the security interest or agricultural lien unless the secured party authorized the disposition free of the security interest or agricultural lien; and

a security interest attaches to any identifiable proceeds of collateral.

Proceeds that are commingled with other property are identifiable proceeds if the proceeds

are goods, to the extent provided by AS

45.29.336

; and

are not goods, to the extent that the secured party identifies the proceeds by a method of tracing, including application of equitable principles, that is permitted under law other than this chapter with respect to commingled property of the type involved.

A security interest in proceeds is a perfected security interest if the security interest in the original collateral was perfected.

A perfected security interest in proceeds becomes unperfected on the 21st day after the security interest attaches to the proceeds unless

the following conditions are satisfied

a filed financing statement covers the original collateral;

the proceeds are collateral in which a security interest may be perfected by filing in the office in which the financing statement has been filed; and

the proceeds are not acquired with cash proceeds;

the proceeds are identifiable cash proceeds; or

the security interest in the proceeds is perfected other than under (c) of this section when the security interest attaches to the proceeds or within 20 days thereafter.

If a filed financing statement covers the original collateral, a security interest in proceeds that remains perfected under (d)(1) of this section becomes unperfected at the later of

when the effectiveness of the filed financing statement lapses under AS

45.29.515

or is terminated under AS

45.29.513

; or

the 21st day after the security interest attaches to the proceeds.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Sec. 45.29.316.
Continued perfection of security interest following change in governing law.

A security interest perfected under the law of the jurisdiction designated in AS

45.29.301

(1) or

45.29.305(c)

remains perfected until the earliest of

the time perfection would have ceased under the law of that jurisdiction;

the expiration of four months after a change of the debtor’s location to another jurisdiction; or

the expiration of one year after a transfer of collateral to a person who thereby becomes a debtor and is located in another jurisdiction.

If a security interest described in (a) of this section becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earliest time or event described in (a) of this section, it remains perfected thereafter. If the security interest does not become perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earliest time or event, it becomes unperfected and is considered never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

A possessory security interest in collateral, other than goods covered by a certificate of title and as-extracted collateral consisting of goods, remains continuously perfected if

the collateral is located in one jurisdiction and subject to a security interest perfected under the law of that jurisdiction;

after the event described in (1) of this subsection occurs, the collateral is brought into another jurisdiction; and

upon entry into the other jurisdiction, the security interest is perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction.

Except as otherwise provided in (e) of this section, a security interest in goods covered by a certificate of title that is perfected by a method under the law of another jurisdiction when the goods become covered by a certificate of title from this state remains perfected until the security interest would have become unperfected under the law of the other jurisdiction had the goods not become so covered.

A security interest described in (d) of this section becomes unperfected as against a purchaser of the goods for value and is considered never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the goods for value if the applicable requirements for perfection under AS

45.29.311(b)

or

45.29.313

are not satisfied before the earlier of

the time the security interest would have become unperfected under the law of the other jurisdiction had the goods not become covered by a certificate of title from this state; or

the expiration of four months after the goods had become so covered.

A security interest in deposit accounts, letter-of-credit rights, or investment property that is perfected under the law of the bank’s jurisdiction, the issuer’s jurisdiction, a nominated person’s jurisdiction, the securities intermediary’s jurisdiction, or the commodity intermediary’s jurisdiction, as applicable, remains perfected until the earlier of

the time the security interest would have become unperfected under the law of that jurisdiction; or

the expiration of four months after a change of the applicable jurisdiction to another jurisdiction.

If a security interest described in (f) of this section becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier of the time or the end of the period described in (f) of this section, it remains perfected thereafter. If the security interest does not become perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier of that time or the end of that period, it becomes unperfected and is considered never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

The following rules apply to collateral to which a security interest attaches within four months after the debtor changes its location to another jurisdiction:

a financing statement filed before the change under the law of the jurisdiction designated in AS

45.29.301

(1) or

45.29.305(c)

is effective to perfect a security interest in the collateral if the financing statement would have been effective to perfect a security interest in the collateral had the debtor not changed its location;

if a security interest perfected by a financing statement that is effective under (1) of this subsection becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier of the time the financing statement would have become ineffective under the law of the jurisdiction designated in AS

45.29.301

(1) or

45.29.305(c)

or the expiration of the four-month period, it remains perfected; if the security interest does not become perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier time or event, it becomes unperfected and is considered never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

If a financing statement naming an original debtor is filed under the law of the jurisdiction designated in AS

45.29.301

(1) or

45.29.305(c)

and the new debtor is located in another jurisdiction, the following rules apply:

the financing statement is effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the new debtor before, and within four months after, the new debtor becomes bound under AS

45.29.203(d)

, if the financing statement would have been effective to perfect a security interest in the collateral had the collateral been acquired by the original debtor;

a security interest perfected by the financing statement and that becomes perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier of the time the financing statement would have become ineffective under the law of the jurisdiction designated in AS

45.29.301

(1) or

45.29.305(c)

or the expiration of the four-month period remains perfected; a security interest that is perfected by the financing statement but that does not become perfected under the law of the other jurisdiction before the earlier time or event becomes unperfected and is considered never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 11 ch 64 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, added (h) and (i).